Rhode Island, session 2025, SB172.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6-26 of the General Laws entitled "Interest and Usury" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
6-26-11. Medical debt interest cap.
(a) For purposes of this section "medical debt" means an obligation of a consumer to pay
an amount for the receipt of healthcare services as defined by § 27-81-3, products, or devices, owed
to a healthcare facility or a healthcare professional as defined by § 27-81-3
(b) Interest on medical debt shall be limited to the rate of interest equal to the weekly
average one-year constant maturity Treasury yield, but not less than one and a half percent per
annum (1.5% p.a.) nor more than four percent per annum (4% p.a.) as published by the Board of
Governors of the Federal Reserve System, for the calendar week preceding the date when the
consumer was first provided with a bill.
(c) The rate of interest provided in subsection (b) of this section shall only be applied to
new debt incurred after the effective date of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000878/SUB A
========